Hawaii statutes.
[§456-20] Failure to verify identity and
signature. (a) A person commits the offense of failure to verify identity
and signature if the person is a commissioned notary public and knowingly
notarizes a document and:

(1) If a witness to the signing of the instrument,
fails to verify the identity of the signer by personally knowing the signer or
by comparing the personal appearance of the signer with satisfactory proof of
the signer's identity; or

(2) If not a witness to the signing of the
instrument, fails to verify the identity of the signer by personally knowing
the signer or by comparing the personal appearance of the signer with
satisfactory proof of the signer's identity; or fails to verify the signature
of the signer by recognizing the signature of the signer by personal
familiarity with the signature, or by comparing the signature with satisfactory
proof of the signer's signature.

(b) Any person who violates this section shall
be guilty of a misdemeanor and shall be sentenced in accordance with chapter
706.

(c) A conviction under this section shall
result in the automatic revocation of the notary public's commission. [L 2008,
c 175, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol10_Ch0436-0474
Next